Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-310
Zoning regulations;
nonconforming use; exception.

(1) No airport zoning regulations adopted under the Airport Zoning Act shall
require the removal, lowering, or
other change or alteration of any existing structure
or tree not conforming to the regulations when adopted or amended or otherwise
interfere with the continuance of any nonconforming use, except as provided
in section 3-311.

(2) Any structure
that has not yet been constructed but that has received, prior to August 1,
2013, zoning approval from the political subdivision exercising zoning jurisdiction
over such structure may be constructed and shall thereafter be considered
an existing structure for purposes of this section.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 6(2), p. 685;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 10.